Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

5-3.5-301. Effective date - applicability.

Section 5-3.5-303 is intended to restate and confirm the existing law of this state, namely that the laws of this state relating to the financial and lending activities are to be applied on a uniform, statewide basis. Parts 1 and 2 of this article shall take effect January 1, 2003. This part 3 shall take effect upon passage. This article shall apply to covered loans offered or entered into on or after January 1, 2003.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1601, § 1, effective June 7.

5-3.5-302. Severability.

The provisions of this article are severable and if any of its provisions are held unconstitutional, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions of this article. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this article would have been adopted if the unconstitutional provisions had not been included.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1601, § 1, effective June 7.

5-3.5-303. Relationship to other laws.

General rule. All political subdivisions of this state, including municipalities, shall be prohibited from enacting and enforcing ordinances, resolutions, and regulations pertaining to lending activities.

Preemption. Any provision of this article preempted by federal law with respect to a national bank or federal savings association shall also, to the same extent, not apply to an operating subsidiary of a national bank or federal savings association that satisfies the requirements for operating subsidiaries established in 12 CFR 5.34, relating to operating subsidiaries, or 12 CFR 559.3, relating to the characteristics of and requirements for subordinate organizations of federal savings associations, nor to a bank chartered under the laws of Colorado or any operating subsidiary of such a state chartered bank.

Interpretation. The provisions of this article shall be interpreted and applied to the fullest extent practical in a manner consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations, and shall not be deemed to constitute an attempt to override federal law.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1601, § 1, effective June 7.